Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-5,169
State Fire Marshal and boiler inspectors; right of entry.

The State Fire Marshal and the boiler inspectors shall have the right and power to enter any building or structure, public or private, for the purpose of inspecting any boilers required to be inspected by the Boiler Inspection Act or gathering information relating to such boilers.

Laws 1943, c. 112, § 2(2), p. 393;

R.S.1943, § 48-703;

R.S.1943, (1984), § 48-703;

Laws 1987, LB 462, § 5;

Laws 1995, LB 438, § 3;

R.S.1943, (2010), § 48-723;

Laws 2019, LB301, § 5.